North Carolina statutes. Chapter 166A. North Carolina Emergency Management Act.
Article 1. North Carolina Emergency Management Act of 1977.

§§ 166A-1 through 166A-6.03.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 166A-1; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 120; repealed by 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-2; 1959, c. 337, s. 1; 1975, c. 734, s. 1; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 121; repealed by 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-3; 1975, c. 734, s. 2; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 122; repealed by 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-4; 1951, c. 1016, s. 2; 1953, c. 1099, s. 1; 1955, c. 387, s. 1; 1975, c. 734, ss. 4-6, 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 123; 2001-214, s. 1; 2006-66, ss. 6.5(c), (d); 2009-193, ss. 1, 2; 2009-397, s. 2; 2012-90, s. 3; repealed by 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-5; 1951, c. 1016, ss. 3, 9; 1953, c. 1099, s. 3; 1955, c. 387, ss. 2, 3, 5; 1957, c. 950, s. 5; 1975, c. 734, ss. 9, 10, 14, 16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 124; 2001-214, s. 2; 2002-179, s. 12; 2009-192, s. 1; 2009-193, s. 3; 2009-196, s. 1; 2009-225, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2012-90, ss. 4 and 5; repealed by 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-6; 1951, c. 1016, s. 4; 1955, c. 387, s. 4; 1959, c. 284, s. 2; c. 337, s. 4; 1975, c. 734, ss. 11, 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1993, c. 321, s. 181(a); 1995, c. 509, s. 125; 2001-214, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-183, s. 127(c); 2012-90, s. 1; repealed by 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-6.01; 2001-214, s. 4; 2001-487, s. 98; 2002-24, s. 1; 2002-159, s. 57.5; 2006-66, s. 6.5(a); repealed by 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-6.02; 2006-66, s. 6.5(b); repealed by 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-6.03; 2009-195, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); repealed by 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012.

§ 166A-6.1.

Recodified as

G.S. 166A-29

by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012.

§§ 166A-7 through 166A-18.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 166A-7; 1951, c. 1016, s. 6; 1953, c. 1099, s. 4; 1957, c. 950, s. 2; 1959, c. 337, s. 5; 1973, c. 620, s. 9; 1975, c. 734, ss. 12, 14, 16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, ss. 126, 127; 2009-196, s. 2; 2009-225, s. 2; repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-8; 1951, c. 1016, s. 6; 1953, c. 1099, s. 4; 1957, c. 950, s. 2; 1959, c. 337, s. 5; 1973, c. 620, s. 9; 1975, c. 734, ss. 12, 14, 16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-9; 1951, c. 1016, s. 8; 1973, c. 803, s. 45; 1975, c. 19, s. 72; c. 734, ss. 13, 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-10; 1951, c. 1016, s. 7; 1975, c. 734, ss. 14, 16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 2009-194, s. 1; repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-11; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-12; 1975, c. 734, s. 3; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 128; repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-13; 1951, c. 1016, s. 10; 1975, c. 734, ss. 14, 16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 129; repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-14; 1957, c. 950, s. 4; 1975, c. 734, s. 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, c. 714, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, ss. 130, 131; 2002-179, s. 20(b); 2006-81, s. 1; 2008-200, s. 1; 2009-146, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), (hhh); repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-15; 1957, c. 950, s. 3; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 2012-12, s. 2; repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-15.1; 1997-232, s. 1; repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 132; repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-17; 2003-103, s. 1; repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012. s. 166A-18; 2005-128, s. 1; 2011-145, ss. 13.25(ww), 19.1(g); repealed by Session Laws 2012-12, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2012.

§ 166A-7-999.

TABLES OF COMPARABLE
SECTIONS FOR
ARTICLES 1 AND 1A OF CHAPTER 166A

Former to Present

Editor’s Note.

— The following table shows G.S. sections from former Article 1 of Chapter 166A, and their comparable provisions in new Article 1A of Chapter 166A.

Former Present Section Section

G.S. 166A-1

G.S. 166A-19

G.S. 166A-2

G.S. 166A-19

.1 G.S. 166A-3

G.S. 166A-1

9.2 G.S. 166A-4

G.S. 166A-19.3

G.S. 166A-5(1)

G.S. 166A-19.1

0 a.9. G.S. 166A-5(1)

G.S. 166A-19.40

G.S. 166A-5(2)

G.S. 166A-19.11

G.S. 166A-5(3)

G.S. 166A-19.12

, (a1) , (b) G.S. 166A-6(a) G.S. 166A-9.20(a) , (a2) G.S. 166A-6(a1)

G.S. 166A-19.2

1 , (c) , (b) G.S. 166A-6(b)

G.S. 166A-19.3

0(a) G.S. 166A-6(d)

G.S. 166A-19.40

G.S. 166A-6.01

G.S. 166A-19.41

G.S. 166A-6.02

G.S. 166A-19.42

G.S. 166A-6.03

G.S. 166A-19.70

G.S. 166A-6.1

G.S. 166A-29

G.S. 166A-7

G.S. 166A-19.15

G.S. 166A-8

G.S. 166A-19.2

2 G.S. 166A-9

G.S. 166A-19.71

G.S. 166A-10

G.S. 166A-19.72

G.S. 166A-11

G.S. 166A-19.73

G.S. 166A-12

G.S. 166A-19.74

G.S. 166A-13

G.S. 166A-19.75

G.S. 166A-14

G.S. 166A-19.60

G.S. 166A-15

G.S. 166A-19.61

G.S. 166A-15.1

G.S. 166A-19.62

G.S. 166A-16

G.S. 166A-19.79

G.S. 166A-17

G.S. 166A-19.76

G.S. 166A-18

G.S. 166A-19.77

Click to view

Present to Former

Editor’s Note.

— The following table shows G.S. sections from new Article 1A of Chapter 166A, and their comparable, former provisions in former Article 1 of Chapter 166A, as well as a few sections from other sources. Where there is no comparable, former section number, the term “n/a” has been inserted.

Present Former Section Section Part 1. General Provisions n/a

G.S. 166A-19

G.S. 166A-1

G.S. 166A-19

.1 G.S. 166A-2

G.S. 166A-1

9.2 G.S. 166A-3

G.S. 166A-19.3

G.S. 166A-4 Part 2. State Emergency Management n/a

G.S. 166A-19.1

0 G.S. 166A-5(1)

G.S. 166A-19.11

G.S. 166A-5(2)

G.S. 166A-19.12

G.S. 166A-5(3) Part 3. Local Emergency Management n/a

G.S. 166A-19.15

G.S. 166A-7

Part 4. Declarations of State of Emergency n/a ,(b) , (a1)

G.S. 166A-19.2

0(a) G.S. 166A-6(a) ,(d) new

G.S. 166A-19.2

0(c) , (a2)

G.S. 166A-19.21

G.S. 166A-6(a1)

G.S. 166A-19.22

G.S. 166A-8

G.S. 166A-19.22

(b)(2) G.S. 14-288.13(c) G.S. 166A-19.22(b)(3) G.S. 14-288.14 new

G.S. 166A-19.23

Part 5. Additional Powers During States of Emergency n/a , (b) , (c)

G.S. 166A-19.3

0(a) G.S. 166A-6(b) , (d) G.S. 166A-19.30(c) G.S. 14-288.15 -(b), , G.S. 166A-19.31(a)

G.S. 14-288.12

(d)-(f), (h) , (b), (d), G.S. 14-288.13(a) G.S. 14-288.16 G.S. 166A-19.31(c) G.S. 14-288.17 new G.S. 166A-19.31(g) Part 6. Funding of Emergency Preparedness and Response n/a ,

G.S. 166A-19.40

G.S. 166A-6(d) a.9. G.S. 166A-5(1)

G.S. 166A-19.41

G.S. 166A-6.01

G.S. 166A-19.42

G.S. 166A-6.02 Part 7. Immunity and Liability n/a

G.S. 166A-19.60

G.S. 166A-14

G.S. 166A-19.61

G.S. 166A-15

G.S. 166A-19.62

G.S. 166A-15.1 Part 8. Miscellaneous Provisions n/a

G.S. 166A-19.70

G.S. 166A-6.01

G.S. 166A-19.71

G.S. 166A-9

G.S. 166A-19.72

G.S. 166A-10

G.S. 166A-19.73

G.S. 166A-11

G.S. 166A-19.74

G.S. 166A-12

G.S. 166A-19.75

G.S. 166A-13

G.S. 166A-19.76

G.S. 166A-17

G.S. 166A-19.77

G.S. 166A-18

G.S. 166A-19.78

G.S. 14-288.19

G.S. 166A-19.79

G.S. 166A-16

Click to view